Hawaii statutes.
§385-2 Definitions, generally. As used
in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Additional unemployment benefits"
means the unemployment compensation benefits payable under this chapter.

"Benefit year" refers to
"benefit year" as that term is defined in section 383-1.

"Claimant" means an individual:

(1) Who has an unexpired benefit year and has
exhausted normal benefits;

(2) Whose benefit year expired, or whose normal
benefits were exhausted, within a period of twenty-six consecutive weeks
immediately preceding the week in which the proclamation provided for in section
385-1 became effective;

(3) Who was employed during the week in which the
governor's proclamation pursuant to section 385-1 became effective, but who
became unemployed and whose total earned wages are insufficient for normal
benefits; or

(4) Whose unemployment was proximately caused by the
disaster identified by the governor in the proclamation provided for in section
385-1 and was self-employed during the week in which the disaster occurred.

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations of the State.

"Fund" means the additional
unemployment compensation fund established by this chapter.

"Normal benefits" means the
unemployment compensation benefits payable pursuant to chapter 383.

"Owner-employee" means a person who
has performed services for an employing unit as defined in section 383-1, and
who is or has been a shareholder owning twenty-five per cent or more of the
corporation's common stock, and director or officer, or both, of a corporation
which is or was the employing unit or who exercises a substantial degree of
control over the direction of corporate activities.

"Unemployment". An individual shall
be deemed "unemployed" in any week during which the individual
performs no services and with respect to which no wages are receivable by the
individual, or in any week of less than full-time work if the wages receivable
by the individual with respect to such week are less than the individual's
weekly benefit amount payable under this chapter.

"Wages" means all remuneration for
services from whatever source, including commissions and bonuses, remuneration
from self-employment, tips or gratuities paid directly to an individual by a
customer of the employer and reported to the employer for payroll tax deduction
purposes, and the cash value of all remuneration in any medium other than
cash. The reasonable cash value of remuneration in any medium other than cash
shall be estimated and determined in accordance with rules prescribed by the
director. For the purposes of this chapter, "wages" does not include
the amount of payment or remuneration set forth in section 383-11.

"Week" means any period of seven
consecutive days as the director may by rule prescribe. [L 1961, c 157, pt of
§1; Supp, §93B-3; HRS §385-2; am L 1982, c 20, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c
162, §7 and c 288, §2]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) The
definition of "benefit year", "383-1" substituted for
"383-1(3)"; and

(2) Paragraphs
(1) and (2) of the definition of "claimant", "or" deleted.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next